Utah statutes.
58-63-301.   Licensure required -- License classifications.

(1)  A license is required to engage in the practice of a contract security company, an armored car company, an armored car security officer, armed private security officer, or unarmed private security officer, except as otherwise provided in Section 58-1-307, 58-63-304, or 58-63-310.

(2)  The division shall issue to a person who qualifies under this chapter a license in the following classifications:

(a)  contract security company;

(b)  armored car company;

(c)  armored car security officer;

(d)  armed private security officer; or

(e)  unarmed private security officer.

